Hawaii statutes.
§425-1.5 Filing in office of the director;
effective time and date. (a) A certified and executed partnership
registration statement, any other statement or certification, or any judicial
decree of dissolution or cancellation, a registration statement for a foreign
general partnership, or any other statement or certification relating thereto,
shall be delivered to the director for filing. Unless the director finds that
any statement or certificate does not conform to law, upon receipt of all
filing fees required by law, the director shall:

(1) Stamp the word "Filed" and the date of
delivery thereof; and

(2) File the document in the director's office.

(b) Upon the filing of a partnership
dissolution statement or judicial decree of dissolution in the office of the
director, the domestic general partnership shall be dissolved as set forth
therein, and upon the effective date of a certificate of withdrawal or a
judicial decree thereof, the foreign general partnership shall be withdrawn.

(c) Articles of conversion and articles of
merger may specify a delayed effective time and date, and if so, the document
becomes effective at the time and date specified. If a delayed effective date
but no time is specified, the document is effective at the close of business on
that date. A delayed effective date for a document may not be later than the
thirtieth day after the date the document is filed. [L 1995, c 198, pt of §1;
am L 2003, c 124, §48]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next